Hawaii statutes.
§605-15.1 Standing. The attorney
general or any bar association in this State may maintain an action for
violations of section 605-14. [L 1975, c 45, pt of §2]

Case Notes

Only bar association or attorney general has standing to
bring action for violation of §605-14. 501 F. Supp. 830 (1980).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next